portugues.dict
abade/pb
aborto/pA
acordo/pSE
afetar/XYScnBR
agasalho/p
aguerrido/fp
ajuizais/S
amolgadela/p
analisar/XYDRv
anexar/XYSc
antenado/fp
aproveitar/XYRScMDnvu
arauto/p
armar/XYRScMDn
aromatizar/XYScnD
atividade/Ip
ativo/fpmdI
atoleiro/p
auscultador/fp
aval/te
avaliar/XYcMDRu
baralhada/p
benfeitor/fp
bivalente/p
bolem/R
brusco/fpm
bug/a
buli/R
caderneta/p
campeonato/pT
canceroso/fpA
cansativo/fp
caricatura/pt
carro/plA
casamentar/XYR
ceifeiro/fp
centralizar/XYScD
certame/p
chefe/puxV
ciclone/pA
classe/pF
clava/p
cobrimos/SR
colaborativo/fp
colonial/ptiA
colores/S
comedimos/S
compatibilidade/Ip
componente/pu
comum/pmI
comunicativo/fpI
conciliar/pXYRcDnv
conclusivo/fpIm
conde/pb
conformar/XYcDI
congelante/Ap
conjugal/ApEO
conjunto/fpmu
consentem/S
consolidar/XYRcnv
construa/SS
construirmos/S
construtor/fpR
contracto/up
contrato/upfp
convocar/XYcDERS
copyright/a
coreto/p
correto/fpmIs
cortesia/Sp
crime/pA
criminoso/fpm
cubra/SRSRSR
cubramos/SRSR
delegacia/up
democracia/Aqp
departamento/pu
depressivo/fpA
derrapante/Ap
descafeinado/fp
descobre/R
descubra/RR
deslizante/Ap
despejo/p
desportivo/pfimA
destrua/SS
destruo/S
detonante/Ap
dialeto/pu
dimensionar/XYMR
discreto/pfmI
distintivo/mfp
distrito/pu
domabilidade/Ip
driver/a
droga/pA
eficiente/Ipm
eleito/fpR
empate/pS
emperrar/XYSM
emprego/pu
empreiteiro/puf
encobres/S
encubramos/S
endireitar/XYR
enrolhar/XYS
enseada/p
equilibrar/XYScDnRB
esposo/fp
estimar/XYcDvu
estruturar/XYRcvDnS
exorcista/p
expedi/R
fascista/pAO
federalista/Ap
ferver/XYRDn
financiar/XYMDRu
foreiro/fp
forro/p
fortalecer/XYSMD
fundar/XYcMDvR
gerente/puV
grossense/p
honrar/XYS
horroroso/fp
humano/pfmtidSu
imperial/pmtiA
incredibilidade/p
ingressar/XYR
instruendo/fp
interesseiro/fpSm
inventar/XYR
investis/RS
invistamos/RSRS
justificar/XYcDIBn
kB/p
letrado/fp
liberal/pmtidA
mal/e
maneta/p
marginal/ptimu
medes/R
mergulhador/fp
mistificar/XYcDS
modem/a
modesto/fpmIs
moralidade/p
mundo/pu
naturalizar/XYcR
nazismo/pA
negoceio/R
negocie/RR
novilatino/fp
nuclear/pA
objetivo/pfmtidu
obrigado/sk
obstruam/S
obstruirmos/S
oitocentos/a
onomatopeico/p
ordenar/XYScMDvR
oxidante/Ap
paciente/pmIp
password/a
pecador/fp
peregrinismo/p
perfeito/pfIms
pessoal/pmidsA
pigmentar/XYSc
polar/pu
politicado/ap
posicionar/XYMR
presidente/pTxV
previnem/S
principado/p
procurador/fp
produtivo/pfmidu
puberdade/EIp
quinhentos/a
racionalidade/Ip
racista/Ap
ramo/plu
regional/ptimu
reguila/p
regularidade/Ip
religioso/pfmidA
representar/XYcDnvu
reprodutor/fp
restrito/pfmI
roubo/pA
saudai/R
scanner/a
seborreia/p
sector/pu
sensato/fpmI
setecentos/a
sincronizar/XYBcS
sismo/pA
sistema/pu
soalheiro/f
submarino/pfA
sucesso/pI
suscetibilidade/p
sustentabilidade/pI
terrorista/Ap
tranquilo/fpmd
trator/pu
trela/p
trezentos/a
tropical/ptu
utilizar/XYcDvRu
venenoso/fpdA
visconde/pb
viseense/p
zeloso/fpm
zona/pu
acórdão/a
afegão/ab
ajuízam/S
aldeão/bp
alemão/eb
alterável/pI
ancião/ap
anfitrião/pb
anticristão/ab
anão/pb
arrendatário/pu
artesão/ab
artrítico/Afp
assonância/p
barrosão/bp
beirão/pb
bretão/pb
campeão/pbTxV
canário/fp
capelão/e
capitão/be
catalão/eb
centenário/fpT
charlatão/e
cidadão/ab
coimbrão/pb
comissão/pu
comparecência/p
conformável/pI
confortável/pmS
construção/pRS
construíeis/S
construístes/S
cortesão/ab
credível/dIp
cristão/ab
cutâneo/fpu
cão/ez
cólico/f
cônsul/xVe
definição/pI
demão/a
destruías/S
destruísseis/S
direção/pI
débil/a
dúctil/fa
eficiência/pI
elevação/p
enraízes/S
enésimo/fp
espadaúdo/pa
folgazão/be
frágil/a
fértil/a
fétido/fp
fútil/a
grão/a
guardião/bp
género/up
helvécio/p
herói/pA
holístico/k
ignóbil/a
imputável/pI
indiciário/fp
infértil/a
irmão/ab
islâmico/fpA
justiça/pI
lacónico/pfH
lançar/XYMDvR
letão/pb
leão/pg
malévolo/fp
mandrião/bp
míssil/a
nostálgico/fp
obstruíra/S
ovário/p
pagão/ab
penetrável/pIm
profético/fp
projétil/a
proteção/pSF
pão/ez
região/pu
reposição/p
responsável/pdIm
revolucionário/pfHAE
sacristão/eb
senão/a
sexagenário/fp
solúvel/pdI
soviético/pfAOx
sudorífico/pfA
sustentável/pdI
são/ab
séssil/a
tecelão/pb
transmissão/pR
tráfego/p
técnico/fp
têxtil/a
venéreo/fpA
verossímil/Ia
verosímil/Ia
vilão/bp
visível/pmdI
vão/ab
órfão/ab
útil/a
